Georgia statutes. TITLE 45 Public Officers and Employees
Article 2 Fair Employment Practices

Cross references.

Sexual harassment in government workplaces,
§

34-5A-1

et seq.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 1983, p. 1097, effective July 1, 1983, deleted the Code sections formerly codified at this article and enacted the present article. The 1983 Act had the effect of amending or reenacting without change the Code sections comprising this article. The 1983 Act also had the effect of repealing former §

45-19-46

, which was enacted by Ga. L. 1982, p. 1253, § 2, and which became effective November 1, 1982 (but see § 1 of the 1982 Act for similar provisions given effect prior to the November 1, 1982, effective date of the Code). Former §

45-19-46

provided for the repeal of this article on July 1, 1985.

Administrative rules and regulations.

Commission on Equal Opportunity, Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Title 186. Employee suggestion program, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Rules of State Personnel Board, Rule 478-1-.22.

Law reviews.

For article surveying recent developments in Georgia administrative law, see 34 Mercer L. Rev. 393 (1982).

For article, “Wheel of Fortune:
A Critique of the ‘Manifest Imbalance’ Requirement for Race-Conscious Affirmative Action under Title VII,” see 43 Ga. L. Rev. 993 (2009).

For annual survey on employment discrimination, see 69 Mercer L. Rev. 1117 (2018).

For article, “Age, Time, and Discrimination,” see 53 Ga. L. Rev. 845 (2019).

For note, “Workin’ 9:00-5:00 for Nine Months:
Assessing Pregnancy Discrimination Laws in Georgia,” see 33 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 771 (2017).

For note, “Employer Beware: Changing the Landscape of Employment Discrimination Claims at the Summary Judgment Stage,” see 68 Mercer L. Rev. 1145 (2017).

For note, “Two Wrongs Don’t Make It Right:
Title VII, Sexual Orientation, and the Misuse of Stare Decisis,” see 52 Ga. L. Rev. 685 (2018).

For note, “Breaking the Binary:
Desegregation of Bathrooms,” see 36 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 381 (2020).

For note, “It’s Their Party and They Can Opt in If They Want to: How the Eleventh Circuit Classifies Party Plaintiffs in an FLSA Collective Action,” see 70 Mercer L. Rev. 783 (2019).

45-19-20.
Short title.

This article shall be known and may be cited as the “Fair Employment Practices Act of 1978.”

History.

Ga. L. 1978, p. 859, § 25; Ga. L. 1983, p. 1097, § 1.

Law reviews.

For note, “Battle of the Sexes: Title VII’s Failure to Protect Women from Discrimination Against Sex-Linked Conditions,” see 53 Ga. L. Rev. 1185 (2019).

For note, “Disparate Impact Under the ADEA: Applicants Need Not Apply,” see 36 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 351 (2019).

For comment, “Blurred Lines:
Sexual Orientation and Gender Nonconformity in Title VII,” see 64 Emory L.J. 911 (2015).

For comment, “ ‘A Fresh Look’: Title VII’s New Promise for LGBT Discrimination Protection Post-Hively,” see 68 Emory L.J. 1101 (2019).

45-19-21.
Purposes and construction of article.

The general purposes of this article are:

To provide for execution within public employment in the state of the policies embodied in Title VII of the federal Civil Rights Act of 1964 (78 Stat. 241), as amended by the Equal Employment Opportunity Act of 1972 (86 Stat. 103), as from time to time amended, the federal Age Discrimination in Employment Act of 1967 (81 Stat. 602), as from time to time amended, and the federal Rehabilitation Act of 1973 (87 Stat. 355), as from time to time amended;

To safeguard all individuals in public employment from discrimination in employment; and

To promote the elimination of discrimination against all individuals in public employment because of such individuals’ race, color, religion, national origin, sex, disability, or age thereby to promote the protection of their interest in personal dignity and freedom from humiliation; to make available to the state their full productive capacities; to secure the state against domestic strife and unrest which would menace its democratic institutions; to preserve the public safety, health, and general welfare; and to further the interests, rights, and privileges of individuals within the state.

This article shall be broadly construed to further the general purposes stated in this Code section and the special purposes of the particular provision involved.

Nothing in this article shall be construed as indicating an intent to exclude local or federal laws on the same subject matter, which laws are not inconsistent with this article.

Nothing contained in this article shall be deemed to repeal any other nonconflicting law of this state relating to discrimination because of race, color, religion, national origin, sex, disability, or age.

History.

Ga. L. 1978, p. 859, § 2; Ga. L. 1983, p. 1097, § 1; Ga. L. 1990, p. 8, § 45; Ga. L. 1995, p. 1302, § 10.

U.S. Code.

The Civil Rights Act of 1964, referred to in this Code section, is codified as

42 U.S.C. § 2000

a et seq. The Equal Employment Opportunity Act of 1972, referred to in this Code section, is codified as

42 U.S.C. § 2000

e et seq. The Age Discrimination in Employment Act of 1967, referred to in this Code section, is codified as

29 U.S.C. § 621

et seq. The Rehabilitation Act of 1973, referred to in this Code section, is codified as

29 U.S.C. § 701

et seq.

Law reviews.

For article, “Gender and Justice in the Courts: A Report to the Supreme Court of Georgia by the Commission on Gender Bias in the Judicial System,” see 8 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 539 (1992).

45-19-22.
Definitions.

As used in this article, the term:

“Administrator” means the administrator of the Commission on Equal Opportunity provided for by Code Section 45-19-24, which agency is composed of an Equal Employment Division and a Fair Housing Division.

“Board” means the Board of Commissioners of the Commission on Equal Opportunity created by Code Section 45-19-23.

“Disability” means a physical or mental impairment which substantially limits one or more of a person’s major life activities, unless an employer demonstrates that the employer is unable to accommodate reasonably to an employee’s or prospective employee’s disability without undue hardship on the conduct of the employer’s operation.

“Discrimination” means any direct or indirect act or practice of exclusion, distinction, restriction, segregation, limitation, refusal, denial, or any other act or practice of differentiation or preference in the treatment of a person or persons because of race, color, religion, national origin, sex, handicap, or age or the aiding, abetting, inciting, coercing, or compelling of such an act or practice. This term shall not include any direct or indirect act or practice of exclusion, distinction, restriction, segregation, limitation, refusal, denial, or any other act or practice of differentiation or preference in the treatment of a person or persons because of religion if an employer demonstrates that the employer is unable to accommodate reasonably an employee’s or prospective employee’s religious observance or practice without undue hardship on the conduct of the employer’s operation.

“Public employer” or “employer” means any department, board, bureau, commission, authority, or other agency of the state which employs 15 or more employees within the state for each working day in each of 20 or more calendar weeks in the current or preceding calendar year. A person elected to public office in this state is a public employer with respect to persons holding positions or individuals applying for positions which are subject to the state system of personnel administration created by Chapter 20 of this title, including the rules and regulations promulgated by the State Personnel Board or any personnel merit system of any agency or authority of this state. A person elected to public office in this state is not a public employer with respect to persons holding positions or individuals applying for positions on such officer’s personal staff or on the policy-making level or as immediate advisers with respect to the exercise of the constitutional or legal powers of the office held by such officer.

“Public employment” means employment by any department, board, bureau, commission, authority, or other agency of the State of Georgia.

“Religion” means all aspects of religious observance and practice as well as belief.

“Unlawful practice” means an act or practice declared to be an unlawful practice in Code Sections 45-19-29 through 45-19-31, 45-19-32, or 45-19-45.

History.

Ga. L. 1978, p. 859, § 1; Ga. L. 1983, p. 1097, § 1; Ga. L. 1984, p. 22, § 45; Ga. L. 1992, p. 1828, § 1; Ga. L. 1995, p. 1302, § 9; Ga. L. 2009, p. 745, § 2/SB 97; Ga. L. 2012, p. 446, § 2-81/HB 642.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2012, p. 446, § 3-1/HB 642, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “Personnel, equipment, and facilities that were assigned to the State Personnel Administration as of June 30, 2012, shall be transferred to the Department of Administrative Services on the effective date of this Act.” This Act became effective July 1, 2012.

Ga. L. 2012, p. 446, § 3-2/HB 642, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “Appropriations for functions which are transferred by this Act may be transferred as provided in Code Section 45-12-90.”

45-19-23.
Creation of Board of Commissioners of the Commission on Equal Opportunity; members; terms; officers; meetings; compensation of members; powers and duties of board; annual report to Governor and General Assembly; special masters’ list.

A Board of Commissioners of the Commission on Equal Opportunity is created. The board shall consist of nine persons. Subject to confirmation by the Senate, the members of the board shall be appointed by the Governor for three-year terms, except as otherwise provided in this subsection. Of the Governor’s initial appointments, three shall be for one-year terms, three shall be for two-year terms, and three shall be for three-year terms. In the event of a vacancy during the term of any member appointed by the Governor whether by reason of death, resignation, or otherwise, the appointment of a successor by the Governor shall be only for the remainder of the unexpired term. The membership of the board shall be representative of a fair and reasonable cross section of the population of the state and one-third of the members shall have experience in labor or Title VII law enforcement or other legal human rights experience; provided, however, that after July 1, 1993, at least three members of the board shall be representative of or have a background in realty, apartment management, or the building and contracting industry.

The board shall annually elect a chair and such other officers as it deems appropriate and shall meet at least three times a year at a time and place specified in writing by the administrator. The board may also meet from time to time upon its own motion, as deemed necessary by a majority of the members thereof, for the purposes of conducting routine or special business. Each member of the board shall serve without pay; but the members who are not otherwise state officials or employees shall, while engaged in the official duties of the board, receive the same expense allowance and travel cost reimbursement which members of certain boards and commissions receive pursuant to Code Section 45-7-21.

The board shall make a written report to the Governor and to the General Assembly by December 31 of each year. Such report shall advise the Governor and the members of the General Assembly of the board’s activities and the administration of this article and shall make such recommendation for change, if any, as the board deems proper.

The board shall assist the administrator of the Commission on Equal Opportunity in an advisory capacity in carrying out the duties and functions of the office including but not limited to matters relating to fair employment practices and the effectiveness of the state programs and operations.

The board shall establish and certify to the Governor at the beginning of each fiscal year a list of not less than 12 persons, including females and minorities, licensed to practice law in Georgia, who have experience in labor law, in employment law, or administrative law, from which list the Governor may select, on the basis of rotation in sequential order, special masters as provided for in Code Section 45-19-37. The board may from time to time certify to the Governor additional persons to be added to the aforementioned list.

History.

Ga. L. 1978, p. 859, § 9; Ga. L. 1983, p. 1097, § 1; Ga. L. 1985, p. 149, § 45; Ga. L. 1992, p. 1828, § 2.

Cross references.

Legal mileage allowance, §

50-19-7

.

45-19-24.
Commission on Equal Opportunity created; administrator; assignment of commission to Governor for administrative purposes.

There is created the Commission on Equal Opportunity.
The Governor shall appoint an administrator of the Commission on Equal Opportunity who shall serve at the pleasure of the Governor.
The Commission on Equal Opportunity shall be attached to the office of the Governor for administrative purposes only.
The Commission on Equal Opportunity shall have an Equal Employment Division to assist the administrator in carrying out the provisions of this article.

History.

Ga. L. 1978, p. 859, § 10; Ga. L. 1983, p. 1097, § 1; Ga. L. 1992, p. 1828, § 3.

45-19-25.
Function of administrator.

The function of the administrator shall be to encourage fair treatment for public employees and to discourage unlawful discrimination in public employment.

History.

Ga. L. 1978, p. 859, § 11; Ga. L. 1983, p. 1097, § 1.

45-19-26.
Role of Attorney General.

The Attorney General shall be the legal adviser for the administrator.

History.

Ga. L. 1978, p. 859, § 12; Ga. L. 1983, p. 1097, § 1.

45-19-27.
Additional powers and duties of administrator.

In the enforcement of this article the administrator shall have the following powers and duties:

To maintain an office in the City of Atlanta and such other offices within the state as the administrator may deem necessary;

To meet and exercise the administrator’s powers at any place within the state;

Within the limitations provided by law, to appoint clerks and other employees and agents as the administrator may deem necessary, to include employees and agents to represent complainants at special master hearings as provided in Code Section 45-19-37;

To cooperate with individuals and with state, local, and other agencies, both public and private, and to obtain upon request and utilize the services of all governmental departments and agencies;

To cooperate with the United States Equal Employment Opportunity Commission created by Section 705 of the Civil Rights Act of 1964 (78 Stat. 241), as amended, and with other federal and local agencies in order to achieve the purposes of that act; and to cooperate with other federal and local agencies in order to achieve the purposes of this article;

To accept gifts, bequests, grants, or other public or private payments on behalf of the state and to pay such moneys into the state treasury;

To accept on behalf of the state reimbursement pursuant to Section 709(b) of the Civil Rights Act of 1964 (78 Stat. 241), as amended, for services rendered to assist the United States Equal Employment Opportunity Commission;

To receive, initiate, investigate, seek to conciliate, and make determinations regarding complaints alleging violations of this article and to approve or disapprove plans required by the Governor to eliminate or reduce imbalance in employment with respect to race, color, disability, religion, sex, national origin, or age;

To furnish technical assistance requested by persons subject to this article to further their compliance with this article or an order issued thereunder;

To investigate and make studies, subject to approval by the Governor, of unlawful practices in public employment and, in connection therewith, to hold hearings, to request the attendance of persons to give testimony, to receive for the record at any such hearing written statements, documents, exhibits, and other items pertinent to the subject matter of any such hearing, and, following any such investigation or hearing, to issue such report and recommendations as will in its opinion assist in carrying out the purposes of this article;

To require answers to interrogatories, examine witnesses, and require the production of documents so long as it is relevant to the investigation of a complaint;

To render written reports to the Governor and the General Assembly. The reports may contain recommendations of the administrator for legislative or other action to effectuate the purposes and policies of this article;

To make provision for technical and clerical assistance to the Board of Commissioners of the Commission on Equal Opportunity;

To adopt, promulgate, amend, and rescind, subject to approval of the board and the Governor and after giving proper notice and hearing to all public employers pursuant to Chapter 13 of Title 50, the “Georgia Administrative Procedure Act,” such rules and regulations as may be necessary to carry out the provisions of this article, including regulations requiring the posting or inclusion in advertising material of notices prepared or approved by the administrator and regulations regarding the filing, approval, or disapproval of plans to eliminate or reduce imbalance in employment with respect to race, color, disability, religion, sex, national origin, or age;

To cooperate with other organizations, public and private, to discourage unlawful practices and discrimination in employment;

To maintain with the United States Equal Employment Opportunity Commission status as a “deferral agency” under Section 706 of the Civil Rights Act of 1964 (78 Stat. 241), as amended, as provided by the rules and regulations of said commission or as a “referral agency” under Section 709 of the Civil Rights Act of 1964 (78 Stat. 241), as amended; and

To require, pursuant to rules and regulations promulgated by the administrator under the authority of paragraph (14) of this Code section, from any state agency or department such reports and information at such times as it may deem reasonably necessary to carry out the purposes of this article.

History.

Ga. L. 1978, p. 859, §§ 12, 13; Ga. L. 1983, p. 1097, § 1; Ga. L. 1992, p. 6, § 45; Ga. L. 1992, p. 1828, § 4; Ga. L. 1995, p. 1302, § 10.

U.S. Code.

The Civil Rights Act of 1964, referred to in this Code section, is codified as

42 U.S.C. § 2000

a et seq.

45-19-28.
Limitation on provisions of article relating to age discrimination.

The provisions of this article relating to discrimination in employment on the basis of age shall apply only to individuals who are at least 40 years of age but less than 70 years of age.

History.

Ga. L. 1983, p. 1097, § 1.

Cross references.

Age discrimination in employment generally, §

34-1-2

.

45-19-29.
Unlawful practices generally.

It is an unlawful practice for an employer:

To fail or refuse to hire, to discharge, or otherwise to discriminate against any individual with respect to the individual’s compensation, terms, conditions, or privileges of employment because of such individual’s race, color, religion, national origin, sex, disability, or age;

To limit, segregate, or classify his employees in any way which would deprive or tend to deprive an individual of employment opportunities or otherwise adversely affect an individual’s status as an employee because of such individual’s race, color, religion, national origin, sex, disability, or age; or

To hire, promote, advance, segregate, or affirmatively hire an individual solely because of race, color, religion, national origin, sex, disability, or age, but this paragraph shall not prohibit an employer from voluntarily adopting and carrying out a plan to fill vacancies or hire new employees in a manner to eliminate or reduce imbalance in employment with respect to race, color, disability, religion, sex, national origin, or age if the plan has first been filed with the administrator for review and comment for a period of not less than 30 days.

History.

Ga. L. 1978, p. 859, § 3; Ga. L. 1983, p. 1097, § 1; Ga. L. 1984, p. 22, § 45; Ga. L. 1995, p. 1302, § 10.

Cross references.

Constitutional guarantee of freedom of religion, Ga. Const. 1983, Art. I, Sec. I, Para. III and Para. IV.

Discrimination in employment on basis of sex generally, Ch. 5, T. 34, C. 5.

Giving of preference to veterans, their widowed spouses, and dependents in the matter of employment in Department of Veterans Service, §

38-4-9

.

45-19-30.
Unlawful practices in training or apprenticeship programs.

It is an unlawful practice for an employer controlling apprenticeship or other training or retraining including on-the-job training programs to discriminate against an individual because of such individual’s race, color, religion, national origin, sex, disability, or age in admission to or employment in any program established to provide apprenticeship or other training or to discriminate by allowing admission or promotion to an apprenticeship or training program solely because of race, color, religion, national origin, sex, disability, or age.

History.

Ga. L. 1978, p. 859, § 4; Ga. L. 1983, p. 1097, § 1; Ga. L. 1995, p. 1302, § 10.

45-19-31.
Unlawful practices in advertisement of employment.

It is an unlawful practice for an employer to print or publish or cause to be printed or published a notice or advertisement relating to employment by such an employer indicating any preference, limitation, specification, or discrimination based on race, color, religion, national origin, sex, disability, or age, except that such a notice or advertisement may indicate a preference, limitation, or specification based on race, color, religion, national origin, sex, disability, or age when religion, national origin, sex, disability, or age is a bona fide occupational qualification for employment.

History.

Ga. L. 1978, p. 859, § 5; Ga. L. 1983, p. 1097, § 1; Ga. L. 1995, p. 1302, § 10.

45-19-32.
Unlawful practice for party to violate conciliation agreement.

It is an unlawful practice for a party to a conciliation agreement made pursuant to subsection (e) of Code Section 45-19-36 to violate the terms of the agreement.

History.

Ga. L. 1978, p. 859, § 21; Ga. L. 1983, p. 1097, § 1; Ga. L. 1986, p. 10, § 45.

45-19-33.
Different standards of compensation or different terms and conditions of employment when not based on race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability, or age.

It is not an unlawful practice for an employer to apply different standards of compensation or different terms, conditions, or privileges of employment pursuant to a bona fide seniority or merit system, or a system which measures earnings by quantity or quality of production, or to employees who work in different locations, provided that such differences are not the result of an intention to discriminate because of race, color, religion, national origin, sex, disability, or age; nor is it an unlawful practice for an employer to give and to act upon the results of any professionally developed ability test, provided that such test, its administration, or action upon the results thereof is not designed, intended, or used to discriminate because of race, color, religion, national origin, sex, disability, or age.

History.

Ga. L. 1978, p. 859, § 7; Ga. L. 1983, p. 1097, § 1; Ga. L. 1995, p. 1302, § 10.

45-19-34.
Hiring, employing, or selecting for training programs when religion or national origin a bona fide occupational qualification.

It is not an unlawful practice for an employer to hire and employ employees or to select an individual in any training program on the basis of religion or national origin in those certain instances where religion or national origin is a bona fide occupational qualification reasonably necessary to the normal functions of that particular employer’s responsibilities.

History.

Ga. L. 1978, p. 859, § 6; Ga. L. 1983, p. 1097, § 1.

45-19-35.
Use of quotas because of imbalances in employee ratios prohibited; grants of preferential treatment to certain individuals or groups not required by article; adoption of plans required by Governor to reduce imbalance; effect of article upon certain employment practices.

Quotas because of imbalances in employee ratios shall not be permitted.

Nothing contained in this article requires an employer to grant preferential treatment to an individual or to a group because of the race, color, religion, national origin, sex, disability, or age of the individual or group on account of an imbalance which may exist with respect to the total number or percentage of persons of any race, color, religion, national origin, sex, disability, or age in the state or a community, section, or other area or in the available work force in the state or a community, section, or other area.

It is specifically provided that neither subsection (a) nor (b) of this Code section nor any other provision of this article shall prohibit an employer from adopting or carrying out a plan to fill vacancies or hire new employees in a manner to eliminate or reduce imbalance in employment with respect to race, color, disability, religion, sex, national origin, or age if such plan is required by the Governor and filed with and approved by the administrator prior to its final adoption and implementation.

Nothing contained in this article prohibits:

Minimum hiring ages otherwise provided by law;

State compliance with federal regulations;

Termination of the employment of any person who is unable or incompetent or refuses to perform the person’s duties;

Any physical or medical examinations of applicants or employees which an employer requires to determine fitness for the job or position sought or held; or

An employer from observing the terms of a bona fide seniority system or any bona fide employee benefit plan such as a retirement, pension, or insurance plan which is not a subterfuge to evade the purposes of this article.

History.

Ga. L. 1978, p. 859, § 8; Ga. L. 1983, p. 1097, § 1; Ga. L. 1995, p. 1302, § 10.

45-19-36.
Filing complaints of unlawful practice; action by administrator.

As used in this Code section, the term “respondent” means an employer charged with an alleged unlawful practice.

An individual claiming to be aggrieved by an unlawful practice or another person on behalf of an individual claiming to be aggrieved by an unlawful practice may file with the administrator a written, sworn complaint stating that an unlawful practice has been committed setting forth the facts upon which the complaint is based and setting forth facts sufficient to enable the administrator to identify the employer charged. The administrator’s staff shall promptly investigate the allegations of unlawful practice set forth in the complaint and, within 15 days of filing, shall serve the respondent with a copy of the complaint. The complaint shall be barred unless filed within 180 days after the alleged unlawful practice occurs.

Within 90 days after the complaint has been filed, the administrator shall determine whether there is reasonable cause to believe the respondent has engaged in an unlawful practice. If it is determined that there is no reasonable cause to believe that the respondent has engaged in an unlawful practice, the administrator shall issue an order dismissing the complaint.

Within ten days after receiving a copy of the order dismissing the complaint, the complainant may file with the administrator an application for reconsideration of the order. Upon such application, the administrator shall determine within 15 days whether there is reasonable cause to believe that the respondent has engaged in an unlawful practice. If it is again determined that there is no reasonable cause to believe that the respondent has engaged in an unlawful practice, the administrator shall issue an order dismissing the complaint and notifying the complainant that such complainant has the right to request a right to bring an action letter from the appropriate federal agency or petition for review in the appropriate superior court as provided for in Code Section 45-19-39.

After investigation or after the review provided for in subsection (d) of this Code section, if the administrator determines that there is reasonable cause to believe that the respondent has engaged in an unlawful practice, then the administrator’s staff shall first endeavor to eliminate the alleged unlawful practice by conference, conciliation, and persuasion. The terms of a conciliation agreement reached with a respondent may require the respondent to refrain from the commission of unlawful discriminatory practices in the future and make such further provisions as may be agreed upon between the administrator and the respondent. If a conciliation agreement is entered into, the administrator shall issue and serve on the complainant a final order stating its terms. Except for the terms of the conciliation agreement, neither the administrator nor any agent thereof shall make public without the written consent of the complainant and the respondent information concerning efforts in the particular case to eliminate an unlawful practice by conference, conciliation, or persuasion, whether or not there is a determination of reasonable cause or a conciliation agreement.

In the event the administrator determines that there is reasonable cause to believe that an agency or authority has engaged in an unlawful practice as defined in this article and the administrator’s staff is unable to eliminate the alleged unlawful practice by conference, conciliation, and persuasion, the administrator shall refer the complaint to a special master as provided for in Code Section 45-19-37.

At the expiration of one year from the date of a conciliation agreement and at other times in its reasonable discretion, the administrator’s staff may investigate whether the terms of the agreement have been and are being complied with by the respondent. The administrator shall report the findings to the complainant and respondent. If the administrator finds reasonable cause to believe that the agreement has been breached, the complainant may seek enforcement of the agreement in the superior court of the county in which the alleged violation took place or in the county of the respondent’s residence.

The administrator shall issue to the complainant and the respondent, 90 days from the date the complaint was filed and every 30 days thereafter, a status report summarizing any action taken with respect to the complaint. The status reports required by this subsection shall be issued until final resolution of the complaint.

History.

Ga. L. 1978, p. 859, §§ 12, 14; Ga. L. 1983, p. 1097, § 1; Ga. L. 1984, p. 22, § 45; Ga. L. 1985, p. 149, § 45; Ga. L. 1986, p. 10, § 45; Ga. L. 1989, p. 1210, § 1.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to
Code Section 28-9-5, in 1987, a comma between “employer” and “charged” was deleted in the first sentence in subsection (b).

45-19-37.
Appointment of special master to conduct hearing on complaint; procedure.

Unless the administrator has issued an order dismissing the complaint or stating the terms of a conciliation agreement within 90 days after a complaint is filed, the administrator shall request that the Governor appoint, from the list provided for by subsection (e) of Code Section 45-19-23, a special master to conduct a hearing in accordance with this article. Not more than 15 working days after such request, the Governor shall select and appoint a special master who must be an attorney licensed to practice law in this state. The special master shall have all of the power and authority granted to agencies in conducting hearings and rendering final orders under Chapter 13 of Title 50, the “Georgia Administrative Procedure Act,” including but not limited to subpoena power.

Not more than seven days after the appointment of the special master, the administrator shall serve on the respondent and on the complainant or the complainant’s attorney by registered or certified mail or statutory overnight delivery a written notice together with a copy of the complaint requiring the respondent to answer the charges contained therein at a hearing before the special master at a time and place specified in the notice. Such notice must contain all general and specific charges against the respondent.

The respondent shall serve an answer with the special master by registered or certified mail or statutory overnight delivery not more than 20 working days after receipt of the notice of hearing, which 20 working days may be extended by the special master in the special master’s discretion for an additional time not to exceed ten working days. The respondent’s answer must show by a certificate of service that the respondent has served a copy of the answer on the complainant or the complainant’s attorney at the last known address of the complainant or the complainant’s attorney where complainant is represented by an attorney. Upon leave of the special master, the complainant may amend the charges contained in the notice of hearing. The respondent may amend an answer at any time prior to the hearing or, upon leave of the special master, may amend thereafter. No final order shall be issued unless the respondent has had the opportunity of a hearing on the charges contained in the notice of hearing or amendment on which the final order is based. If the respondent fails to answer the complaint, the special master may enter the respondent’s default. Unless the default is set aside for good cause shown, the hearing may proceed on the evidence in support of the complaint.

At any time after a notice of hearing is served upon a respondent, discovery shall be authorized in the same manner and fashion as discovery is permitted under Code Sections 9-11-26 through 9-11-37. Any order contemplated in Code Sections 9-11-26 through 9-11-37 may be issued by the special master. Judicial enforcement of any such order may be obtained by the complainant or respondent in the same manner as is provided for the enforcement of final orders in Code Section 45-19-40.

A respondent who has filed an answer or whose default in answering has been set aside for good cause shown may appear at the hearing, may examine and cross-examine witnesses and the complainant, and may offer evidence. The complainant and, at the discretion of the special master, any other person may intervene, examine and cross-examine witnesses, and present evidence.

Efforts at conference, conciliation, and persuasion shall not be received in evidence.

Testimony taken at the hearing shall be under oath and shall be stenographically or otherwise recorded by a certified court reporter. After the hearing, the special master at the special master’s discretion may take further evidence or hear arguments upon notice to all parties with an opportunity to be present.

Except as otherwise specifically provided for in this article, all proceedings of the special master shall be conducted as provided for with respect to contested cases in Chapter 13 of Title 50.

A complainant may retain at the complainant’s own expense private counsel to represent the complainant in any proceeding provided for under this article; however, the complainant may utilize the services of an individual employed by the administrator pursuant to paragraph (3) of Code Section 45-19-27 in presenting the complainant’s case before the special master.

History.

Ga. L. 1978, p. 859, § 1; Ga. L. 1983, p. 1097, § 1; Ga. L. 1984, p. 22, § 45; Ga. L. 2000, p. 1589, § 3.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2000, p. 1589, § 16, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that the amendment to this Code section is applicable with respect to notices delivered on or after July 1, 2000.

Law reviews.

For article, “The New Special Master Rule — Uniform Superior Court Rule 46: Life Jackets for the Courts in the Perfect Storm,”
see 15 (No. 4) Ga. St. B.J. 20 (2009).

45-19-38.
Findings, conclusions, and order of special master generally; order to cease and desist from unlawful practice and to take remedial action.

If the special master determines that the respondent has not engaged in an unlawful practice, the special master shall state the special master’s findings of fact and conclusions of law and shall issue a final order, within 30 days after the hearing unless, for good cause shown, such time is extended by the Governor, dismissing the complaint.

If the special master determines that the respondent has engaged in an unlawful practice, the special master shall state the special master’s findings of fact and conclusions of law and shall issue a final order, within 30 days after the hearing unless, for good cause shown, such time is extended by the Governor, requiring the respondent to cease and desist from the unlawful practice and to take such remedial action as in the judgment of the special master will carry out the purposes of this article.

Remedial action under this Code section may include but is not limited to:

Hiring, reinstatement, or upgrading of employees with or without back pay. No award of back pay shall be ordered pursuant to this article with respect to any period more than two years prior to the date of the filing with the administrator of the complaint with respect to which such award of back pay is ordered. Interim earnings, unemployment benefits, workers’ compensation benefits, or amounts earnable with reasonable diligence by the person or persons discriminated against shall operate to reduce the back pay otherwise allowable;

Admission or restoration of individuals to participate in a guidance program, apprenticeship training program, on-the-job training program, or other occupational training or retraining program and the utilization of objective criteria in the admission of individuals to such programs;

The extension to all individuals of the full and equal enjoyment of the advantages, facilities, privileges, and services of the respondent;

Reporting as to the manner of compliance;

Posting notices in conspicuous places in the respondent’s place of operation in the form prescribed by the administrator or special master;

Restoration of employment benefits not otherwise specified in this Code section; or

Recommending to the Governor that the respondent be required to adopt and file with the administrator, within a specified time limitation, for the administrator’s approval a plan to fill vacancies or hire new employees in a manner to eliminate or reduce imbalance in employment with respect to race, color, disability, religion, sex, national origin, or age.

Any monetary award ordered pursuant to this article shall be for actual damages only.

The respondent shall comply without delay with the terms and conditions of such a final order.

History.

Ga. L. 1978, p. 859, § 16; Ga. L. 1983, p. 1097, § 1; Ga. L. 1995, p. 1302, § 10.